Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska2-3958
Mandatory assessment; board; duties.

(1) There shall be paid to the board a mandatory assessment of ten cents per hundredweight on all milk produced in the State of Nebraska for commercial use.

(2) The board may audit financial and other records of first purchasers of milk, producers, and their agents pertaining to the assessment provided for in this section and otherwise ensure compliance with the Dairy Industry Development Act.

(3) For purposes of the act, when milk is sold to an out-of-state purchaser, the sale shall be deemed to have occurred in Nebraska if the milk was otherwise produced within Nebraska immediately prior to such sale and such sale is the first purchase of the milk for commercial use.

(4) For purposes of the act, when milk is produced out-of-state but sold to a first purchaser of milk in Nebraska, the assessment provided for in this section may be assessed and retained in Nebraska only if the producer consents.

Laws 1992, LB 275, § 11.